Massachusetts, session 194th, S1753.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32B or Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of subsection (a) the following
sentence:-
"“Any Class C substance defined in section 31 of this chapter, synthetic chemical
substance, or agent that has mind altering or mood changing effects is strictly prohibited in
correctional facilities, and the distribution, possession or use of such chemical substances would
be a felony in the state of Massachusetts, punishable with minimum jail or prison sentence of a
minimum 2.5 years on or after their current prison sentence"
of 1